Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.68, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9a. new text end new text begin Championship golf tournaments admission and related events. new text end new text begin The granting of the privilege of admission to a world championship golf tournament sponsored by the Professional Golfers' Association of America and to related events sponsored by the Professional Golfers' Association of America is exempt. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end